Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska31-914
Drainage improvements; cost; payment; warrant.

The cost of each improvement shall be paid by warrant signed by the county clerk drawn upon the county treasurer, which warrant shall designate the particular improvement project upon which it is drawn and shall be paid from money received from assessments on lots and lands in the particular improvement project.

Laws 1959, c. 132, § 14, p. 489.